Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.240

Sale, lease, exchange, etc., of property and assets.

A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property and assets of a corporation may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any corporation for profit, domestic or foreign, as may be authorized in the following manner:

(1) The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members or shareholders which may be either an annual or a special meeting.

(2) Written or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice by electronic transmission, stating that the purpose or one of the purposes of such meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the corporation shall be given to each member and shareholder within the time and in the manner provided by this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members and shareholders.

(3) At such meeting the members may authorize such sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition and may fix, or may authorize the board of directors to fix, any or all of the terms and conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by the corporation therefor.

(4) Such authorization shall require at least two-thirds of the votes which members and shareholders present at such meetings in person, by mail, by electronic transmission, or represented by proxy are entitled to cast: PROVIDED, That even after such authorization by a vote of members or shareholders, the board of directors may, in its discretion, without further action or approval by members, abandon such sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of assets, subject only to the rights of third parties under any contracts relating thereto.

[ 2000 c 167 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 48.]